District of Columbia statutes.
20-904

Exempt assets.

Where the decedent was the head of the family or a householder the property exempt under sections 15-501 through 15-503 shall continue to be exempt from all claims against the decedent.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
1981 Ed., § 20-904.